Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4207
Rules of practice and procedure.

The Supreme Court may promulgate rules of practice and procedure for implementation of sections 29-4201 to 29-4207.

Laws 1999, LB 623, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 26.